Mississippi, session 2026, SB2599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  The Department of Finance and Administration, acting on behalf of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, shall sell and convey or lease, according to the terms agreed upon by the parties, real property currently used by and for the benefit of the Highway Safety Patrol as its Troop H Headquarters and Driver Service Bureau facility, and any improvements thereon, located in Lauderdale County, Mississippi, to Compass Datacenters JAN I, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, with the property being more particularly described as follows: Property located at 910 Highway 11 & 80, Meridian, Lauderdale County, Mississippi; Parcel #081020000000000402/PPIN#49049 consisting of approximately 8.85 acres and all structures and improvements. (2)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall obtain a legal description of the property prior to conveyance, and such legal description shall be included in the deed or other instrument of conveyance. (3)  The real property and improvements described in subsection (1) of this section shall not be purchased for an amount less than the current fair market value as determined by the average of two (2) appraisals by qualified appraisers, at least one (1) of whom shall be selected by the Department of Public Safety, and both of whom shall be certified and licensed by the Mississippi Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board. (4)  Compass Datacenters JAN I, LLC, shall pay any and all closing costs related to the acquisition of this property. (5)  The Department of Public Safety is authorized to correct any discrepancies in the legal descriptions of the property or purchasing entity provided in subsections (1) through (6) of this section. (6)  All monies derived from the sale or lease of the property authorized in this section shall be deposited in the State General Fund. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.